Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/en_Supplemental.aff
FLAG num
SFX 220 N 1
SFX 220 0 atherfish .

SFX 221 N 1
SFX 221 0 atherjack .

SFX 222 N 1
SFX 222 0 atherjacket .

SFX 223 N 1
SFX 223 0 atherleaf .

SFX 224 N 1
SFX 224 0 atherleaves .

SFX 225 N 1
SFX 225 0 atherlike .

SFX 226 N 1
SFX 226 0 atherwood .

SFX 227 N 1
SFX 227 0 atherwoods .

SFX 228 N 1
SFX 228 0 atherwork .

SFX 229 N 1
SFX 229 0 atherworks .

SFX 230 N 1
SFX 230 0 atic .

SFX 231 N 1
SFX 231 0 atin .

SFX 232 N 1
SFX 232 0 ating .

SFX 233 N 1
SFX 233 0 atinic .

SFX 234 N 1
SFX 234 0 ation .

SFX 235 N 1
SFX 235 0 ations .

SFX 236 N 1
SFX 236 0 atite .

SFX 237 N 1
SFX 237 0 atites .

SFX 238 N 1
SFX 238 0 ative .

SFX 239 N 1
SFX 239 0 atli .

SFX 240 N 1
SFX 240 0 atocele .

SFX 241 N 1
SFX 241 0 atochezia .

SFX 242 N 1
SFX 242 0 atocoele .

SFX 243 N 1
SFX 243 0 atocolpometra .

SFX 244 N 1
SFX 244 0 atocolpos .

SFX 245 N 1
SFX 245 0 atocrit .

SFX 246 N 1
SFX 246 0 atocytopenia .

SFX 247 N 1
SFX 247 0 atocyturia .

SFX 248 N 1
SFX 248 0 atogenesis .

SFX 249 N 1
SFX 249 0 atogenic .

SFX 250 N 1
SFX 250 0 atohiston .

SFX 251 N 1
SFX 251 0 atoidin .

SFX 252 N 1
SFX 252 0 atological .

SFX 253 N 1
SFX 253 0 atologist .

SFX 254 N 1
SFX 254 0 atologists .

SFX 255 N 1
SFX 255 0 atology .

SFX 256 N 1
SFX 256 0 atolysis .

SFX 257 N 1
SFX 257 0 atoma .

SFX 258 N 1
SFX 258 0 atomas .

SFX 259 N 1
SFX 259 0 atopoiesis .

SFX 260 N 1
SFX 260 0 atopoietic .

SFX 261 N 1
SFX 261 0 ator .

SFX 262 N 1
SFX 262 0 aturia .

SFX 263 N 1
SFX 263 0 atwort .

SFX 264 N 1
SFX 264 0 atworts .

SFX 265 N 1
SFX 265 0 au .

SFX 266 N 1
SFX 266 0 aur .

SFX 267 N 1
SFX 267 0  Australe .

SFX 268 N 1
SFX 268 0  Australis .

SFX 269 N 1
SFX 269 0  Austrini .

SFX 270 N 1
SFX 270 0  Austrinus .

SFX 271 N 1
SFX 271 0 avis .

SFX 272 N 1
SFX 272 0 avyurt .

SFX 273 N 1
SFX 273 0 axia .

SFX 274 N 1
SFX 274 0 axias .

SFX 275 N 1
SFX 275 0 axic .

SFX 276 N 1
SFX 276 0 axis .

SFX 277 N 1
SFX 277 0 ay .

SFX 278 N 1
SFX 278 0 aydah .

SFX 279 N 1
SFX 279 0 ayen .

SFX 280 N 1
SFX 280 0 aymaniyah .

SFX 281 N 1
SFX 281 0 ays .

SFX 282 N 1
SFX 282 0 azhen .

SFX 283 N 1
SFX 283 0 b .

SFX 284 N 1
SFX 284 0 ba .

SFX 285 N 1
SFX 285 0 baceous .

SFX 286 N 1
SFX 286 0 bach .

SFX 287 N 1
SFX 287 0 back .

SFX 288 N 1
SFX 288 0 bacon .

SFX 289 N 1
SFX 289 0 bacons .

SFX 290 N 1
SFX 290 0 bad .

SFX 291 N 1
SFX 291 0 badell .

SFX 292 N 1
SFX 292 0 bah .

SFX 293 N 1
SFX 293 0 bal .

SFX 294 N 1
SFX 294 0 baldi .

SFX 295 N 1
SFX 295 0 baldis .

SFX 296 N 1
SFX 296 0 ball .

SFX 297 N 1
SFX 297 0 bana .

SFX 298 N 1
SFX 298 0 bara .

SFX 299 N 1
SFX 299 0 baragamuwa .

SFX 300 N 1
SFX 300 0 basite .

SFX 301 N 1
SFX 301 0 bate .

SFX 302 N 1
SFX 302 0 bated .

SFX 303 N 1
SFX 303 0 bates .

SFX 304 N 1
SFX 304 0 bating .

SFX 305 N 1
SFX 305 0 bative .

SFX 306 N 1
SFX 306 0 batory .

SFX 307 N 1
SFX 307 0 bazite .

SFX 308 N 1
SFX 308 0 beam .

SFX 309 N 1
SFX 309 0 bed .

SFX 310 N 1
SFX 310 0 beellaha .

SFX 311 N 1
SFX 311 0 beidian .

SFX 312 N 1
SFX 312 0 beleland .

SFX 313 N 1
SFX 313 0 benzene .

SFX 314 N 1
SFX 314 0  Berenices .

SFX 315 N 1
SFX 315 0 berg .

SFX 316 N 1
SFX 316 0 berries .

SFX 317 N 1
SFX 317 0 berry .

SFX 318 N 1
SFX 318 0 bey .

SFX 319 N 1
SFX 319 0 beys .

SFX 320 N 1
SFX 320 0 bhanga .

SFX 321 N 1
SFX 321 0 bility .

SFX 322 N 1
SFX 322 0 billion .

SFX 323 N 1
SFX 323 0 bin .

SFX 324 N 1
SFX 324 0 binoid .

SFX 325 N 1
SFX 325 0 binoids .

SFX 326 N 1
SFX 326 0 bins .

SFX 327 N 1
SFX 327 0 biologic .

SFX 328 N 1
SFX 328 0 biological .

SFX 329 N 1
SFX 329 0 biologically .

SFX 330 N 1
SFX 330 0 biologies .

SFX 331 N 1
SFX 331 0 biologist .

SFX 332 N 1
SFX 332 0 biologists .

SFX 333 N 1
SFX 333 0 biology .

SFX 334 N 1
SFX 334 0 blatt .

SFX 335 N 1
SFX 335 0 ble .

SFX 336 N 1
SFX 336 0 blueth .

SFX 337 N 1
SFX 337 0 bo .

SFX 338 N 1
SFX 338 0 board .

SFX 339 N 1
SFX 339 0 boards .

SFX 340 N 1
SFX 340 0 bohei .

SFX 341 N 1
SFX 341 0 book .

SFX 342 N 1
SFX 342 0 books .

SFX 343 N 1
SFX 343 0  Borealis .

SFX 344 N 1
SFX 344 0 botanies .

SFX 345 N 1
SFX 345 0 botany .

SFX 346 N 1
SFX 346 0 boux .

SFX 347 N 1
SFX 347 0 boy .

SFX 348 N 1
SFX 348 0 boys .

SFX 349 N 1
SFX 349 0 brack .

SFX 350 N 1
SFX 350 0 bracks .

SFX 351 N 1
SFX 351 0 brally .

SFX 352 N 1
SFX 352 0 bran .

SFX 353 N 1
SFX 353 0 brasion .

SFX 354 N 1
SFX 354 0 bromeningitis .

SFX 355 N 1
SFX 355 0 brooke .

SFX 356 N 1
SFX 356 0 brospinal .

SFX 357 N 1
SFX 357 0 brovascular .

SFX 358 N 1
SFX 358 0 bug .

SFX 359 N 1
SFX 359 0 bullying .

SFX 360 N 1
SFX 360 0 bus .

SFX 361 N 1
SFX 361 0 buses .

SFX 362 N 1
SFX 362 0 butazone .

SFX 363 N 1
SFX 363 0 butazones .

SFX 364 N 1
SFX 364 0 by .

SFX 365 N 1
SFX 365 0 byte .

SFX 366 N 1
SFX 366 0 c .

SFX 367 N 1
SFX 367 0 ca .

SFX 368 N 1
SFX 368 0 cainea .

SFX 369 N 1
SFX 369 0 cal .

SFX 370 N 1
SFX 370 0 cally .

SFX 371 N 1
SFX 371 0 cang .

SFX 372 N 1
SFX 372 0 cao .

SFX 373 N 1
SFX 373 0 cardiac .

SFX 374 N 1
SFX 374 0 cardial .

SFX 375 N 1
SFX 375 0 carditides .

SFX 376 N 1
SFX 376 0 carditis .

SFX 377 N 1
SFX 377 0 carp .

SFX 378 N 1
SFX 378 0 cast .

SFX 379 N 1
SFX 379 0 cated .

SFX 380 N 1
SFX 380 0 cation .

SFX 381 N 1
SFX 381 0 ccharidase .

SFX 382 N 1
SFX 382 0 ccharide .

SFX 383 N 1
SFX 383 0 ccharides .

SFX 384 N 1
SFX 384 0 ccord .

SFX 385 N 1
SFX 385 0 ccorded .

SFX 386 N 1
SFX 386 0 ccording .

SFX 387 N 1
SFX 387 0 ccords .

SFX 388 N 1
SFX 388 0 cdoche .

SFX 389 N 1
SFX 389 0 cdoches .

SFX 390 N 1
SFX 390 0 cdochic .

SFX 391 N 1
SFX 391 0 cdochical .

SFX 392 N 1
SFX 392 0 ce .

SFX 393 N 1
SFX 393 0 če .

SFX 394 N 1
SFX 394 0 cean .

SFX 395 N 1
SFX 395 0 ceate .

SFX 396 N 1
SFX 396 0 ced .

SFX 397 N 1
SFX 397 0 ceity .

SFX 398 N 1
SFX 398 0 cellular .

SFX 399 N 1
SFX 399 0 cellularity .

SFX 400 N 1
SFX 400 0 cementoclasia .

SFX 401 N 1
SFX 401 0 cen .

SFX 402 N 1
SFX 402 0 center .

SFX 403 N 1
SFX 403 0 ceous .

SFX 404 N 1
SFX 404 0 cephalic .

SFX 405 N 1
SFX 405 0 cephaly .

SFX 406 N 1
SFX 406 0 ception .

SFX 407 N 1
SFX 407 0 ceptions .

SFX 408 N 1
SFX 408 0 ceptor .

SFX 409 N 1
SFX 409 0 ceratops .

SFX 410 N 1
SFX 410 0 cerebellum .

SFX 411 N 1
SFX 411 0 ces .

SFX 412 N 1
SFX 412 0 cete .

SFX 413 N 1
SFX 413 0 ch .

SFX 414 N 1
SFX 414 0 chabu .

SFX 415 N 1
SFX 415 0 chabun .

SFX 416 N 1
SFX 416 0 chaburi .

SFX 417 N 1
SFX 417 0 chak .

SFX 418 N 1
SFX 418 0 chalaca .

SFX 419 N 1
SFX 419 0 chang .

SFX 420 N 1
SFX 420 0 chanical .

SFX 421 N 1
SFX 421 0 chanics .

SFX 422 N 1
SFX 422 0 chat .

SFX 423 N 1
SFX 423 0 chats .

SFX 424 N 1
SFX 424 0 chbia .

SFX 425 N 1
SFX 425 0 chemistry .

SFX 426 N 1
SFX 426 0 cheng .

SFX 427 N 1
SFX 427 0 chia .

SFX 428 N 1
SFX 428 0 chiae .

SFX 429 N 1
SFX 429 0 chisis .

SFX 430 N 1
SFX 430 0 chit .

SFX 431 N 1
SFX 431 0 chka .

SFX 432 N 1
SFX 432 0 chloroquine .

SFX 433 N 1
SFX 433 0 choline .

SFX 434 N 1
SFX 434 0 cholines .

SFX 435 N 1
SFX 435 0 cholinesterase .

SFX 436 N 1
SFX 436 0 chuan .

SFX 437 N 1
SFX 437 0 chur .

SFX 438 N 1
SFX 438 0 ci .

SFX 439 N 1
SFX 439 0 ciago .

SFX 440 N 1
SFX 440 0 ciagos .

SFX 441 N 1
SFX 441 0 cide .

SFX 442 N 1
SFX 442 0 cides .

SFX 443 N 1
SFX 443 0 ciego .

SFX 444 N 1
SFX 444 0 ciegos .

SFX 445 N 1
SFX 445 0 cies .

SFX 446 N 1
SFX 446 0 cities .

SFX 447 N 1
SFX 447 0 city .

SFX 448 N 1
SFX 448 0 ck .

SFX 449 N 1
SFX 449 0 clad .

SFX 450 N 1
SFX 450 0 clade .

SFX 451 N 1
SFX 451 0 clades .

SFX 452 N 1
SFX 452 0 clads .

SFX 453 N 1
SFX 453 0 clase .

SFX 454 N 1
SFX 454 0 clases .

SFX 455 N 1
SFX 455 0 climate .

SFX 456 N 1
SFX 456 0 climatologies .

SFX 457 N 1
SFX 457 0 climatology .

SFX 458 N 1
SFX 458 0 cloth .

SFX 459 N 1
SFX 459 0 cloths .

SFX 460 N 1
SFX 460 0 co .

SFX 461 N 1
SFX 461 0 cock .

SFX 462 N 1
SFX 462 0 cocked .

SFX 463 N 1
SFX 463 0 cocking .

SFX 464 N 1
SFX 464 0 cocks .

SFX 465 N 1
SFX 465 0 codynamics .

SFX 466 N 1
SFX 466 0 cogenetics .

SFX 467 N 1
SFX 467 0 cokinetic .
