Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/en_Supplemental.dic
acetyl/212,214,216,232,234,433,434,435,592,819,917,957,1682,1884
acini/366
acyl/214,234,739
ahorse/287
anaphrodisia/366,1682
Anse/284
aphrodisia/369
appro/301,302,303,304,305,306,1576,1577,1956,1996,1997
Bac/265
Bai/1,426,555,557
barm/349,350,1682
bibliomania/369,1682
Bieber/286
biome/420,421,532,533,1682
blae/316,317
blastoderm/230,819,1682
bleb/309,364,1682
borsh/413,1785,1893
bulla/392,411,557,1682,1794
canna/323,324,325,326,1682
categorem/230,557
cere/351,354,356,357,458,459,510,1682,1726
cha/300,307,418,431
chaw/288,289,565,882,1682
cheque/341,342,1590,1613,1640,1667,1682
cold/461,462,463,464,487
colo/360,361,379,380
colour/234,378,565,603,695,696,882,888,917,926,957,1028,1030,1682
Comae/314
Coronae/268,343
croton/358,1682
Cusa/448
Dar/320,346
Debre/401
degust/234
derma/353,1682,1861,1862,1865,1870,1871,1872,1873,1875,1878,1880
disa/381,382,383,384,385,386,387,680,1134,1575,1652,1653,1673,1674,1675,1676,1750,1751,1962
discal/395,396
discolour/234,235,565,882,917,1682
disforest/234,565,882,1682
disinfest/234,235,565,882,1682
emboli/366,2022
eutrophic/234
fibre/338,339,737,738,1484,1485,1682
gallina/394,403
Gao/115,311,426
gari/294,295
gastromy/412
geta/335
glycerogel/231
grey/287,565,603,658,779,882,995,996,1108,1682,1690,1970
haec/397
Hai/426
Hato/340
homolog/214,234,917,957,958,960,961,1682,1921
Hud/278
Huma/372
Ile/337
iodin/212,214,216,232,234,235,1682
Khas/272
Kon/393,544
Lai/323
lobelia/403,1682
longan/317,867,868,869,1682
Luan/426,701,1719
macer/238,1682
Maha/290,521
manga/318,319
Marka/283,2030
Mata/312,525,703
Mian/419,545,2001,2029
minimis/234,235,557,565,646,882
Mira/293,413,962,1123
miso/368,770,771,1092,1093,1264,1265,1548
mould/338,565,846,849,882,888,1682,1999
myelin/214,234,557,646,819,915,955,1682
nano/404,405,425,475,489,490,679,681,1112,1122,1127,1128,1182,1183,1189,1536,1537,1560,1573,1690,1691,1777,1778,1779,1784,1795,1899,1901,1976,1977
Napo/367
Ordu/290
overexploit/234,235
parhelia/369
pharma/465,466,467,468,470,471,485
Phet/415,416
Phi/430
phon/212,234,560,582,603,634
Phu/1,366,978,1383
phyllo/449,450,451,452,515,520,526,1588,1589,1682,1793,1992
pichi/439,440,443,444
pilose/285
pinna/392,411,557,1682,1796,1799,1837,1842,1844
Piscis/269,270
plough/347,348,565,882,888,998,999,1121,1162,1682,1712,1713,1985,1986
programma/321
proprio/406,407,408,1234
rachis/429,646
Rai/437,706,707
rede/460,530,531,1215,1216,1217,1693,1694,1722,1723,1724,1725,1813,1814,2005,2007
Rosen/334,336
Sada/424,1013,1088,1101,1590
sept/82,212,234,235,564,585,820,863,1641,1682
seta/403,557
slub/309,1682
socio/327,328,329,331,332,1046,1047,1048,1185,1186,1187,1306,1540
Soroca/284
spall/234
syllabi/370,446,447,491,1696,2023,2024,2025,2032
syncategorem/230,557
syndic/261,1682
syne/388,389,390,391,427,428,1558,1620,1621,1623,1624,1625,1626,1627,1759,1760,1761,1762,2026
Tai/115,371,426
taichi/436
tatou/277,281,1682
Tau/283,301,323,1290,1592,1598,1630
testa/394,403,1682
thro/214,263,264,1132,1133,1135,1136,1137,1138,1139,1140,1141,1142,1143,1144,1145,1146,1147,1148,1149,1150,1151,1152,1153,1154,1155,1156,1768,1769,1897,1898,1987,1988
Trianguli/268
Triangulum/267
Triesen/315
ubiquitin/234
Ulan/414,797
ultima/445,504,1807,1808
ve/265
vulgaris/234,235,557,603
whin/316,317,422,423,671,846,849,1682,1771
xenotransplant/234
Yau/460
Zou/426,1259,1994
